Colorado, session 2026A, SB066.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Compounding pharmacies play an important role in the United
States drug supply chain and allow patients to receive life-saving or
-2- 066

life-improving medication when the commercial market is unable to
support patients' needs;
(b) The United States food and drug administration, referred to in
this section as the "FDA", provides regulatory oversight and sets
internationally recognized standards for drug approval; however, there
has been an increase in the number of companies that develop, dispense,
and market non-FDA-approved compounded medications, notably
weight-loss drugs;
(c) Patients in Colorado are at risk of receiving compounded
weight-loss medications that are not approved by the FDA or are not
manufactured in compliance with the FDA's current good manufacturing
practice requirements;
(d) The safety and integrity of compounded weight-loss
medications and their ingredients are paramount for the health and
well-being of patients in Colorado;
(e) Patients in Colorado deserve to have clear information
regarding the safety of compounded weight-loss medications and their
ingredients;
(f) Preserving the physician-patient relationship is critical to
health outcomes and protecting a prescriber's scope of care with
individual patients helps to ensure the health of Coloradans; and
(g) Therefore, the general assembly should take action to protect
Coloradans by requiring that compounded weight-loss medications are
sourced from FDA-registered and -inspected facilities and that those
medications contain safe and pharmaceutical-grade ingredients.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-1-741 as
follows:
-3- 066

6-1-741. Regulation of compounded weight-loss medication -
prohibited conduct - labeling requirements - deceptive advertising -
enforcement by attorney general - rules - definitions.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) (I) "BULK DRUG SUBSTANCE" OR "ACTIVE PHARMACEUTICAL
INGREDIENT" MEANS A SUBSTANCE THAT IS INTENDED FOR
INCORPORATION INTO A FINISHED DRUG PRODUCT AND IS INTENDED TO
PROMOTE PHARMACOLOGICAL ACTIVITY OR OTHER DIRECT EFFECTS IN THE
DIAGNOSIS, CURE, MITIGATION, TREATMENT, OR PREVENTION OF DISEASE
OR TO AFFECT THE STRUCTURE OR FUNCTION OF THE BODY.
(II) "BULK DRUG SUBSTANCE" DOES NOT INCLUDE INTERMEDIATES
USED IN THE SYNTHESIS OF THE SUBSTANCE.
(b) "COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION" MEANS A DRUG
THAT:
(I) IS CREATED BY COMBINING, MIXING, OR ALTERING OTHER
DRUGS OR BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES;
(II) IS INTENDED TO BE USED BY HUMANS FOR OBESITY OR WEIGHT
MANAGEMENT OR CONTAINS, OR CLAIMS TO CONTAIN, AN ACTIVE
INGREDIENT THAT IS NAMED IN A DRUG APPROVED BY THE FDA FOR
OBESITY OR WEIGHT MANAGEMENT; AND
(III) IS A GLUCAGON-LIKE PEPTIDE-1 RECEPTOR AGONIST DRUG,
ALSO KNOWN AS A "GLP-1 DRUG".
(c) "DRUG" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 12-280-103
(16).
(d) "FDA" MEANS THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION.
-4- 066

(2) Prohibited conduct.
(a) A PERSON SHALL NOT ENGAGE IN THE SALE, TRANSFER, OR
DISTRIBUTION OF A COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION
COMPOUNDED UNDER SECTION 503A OF THE "FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND
COSMETIC ACT", 21 U.S.C. SEC. 353a, UNLESS THE PERSON COMPOUNDING
THE WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION:
(I) USES BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES THAT:
(A) COMPLY WITH THE STANDARDS OF AN APPLICABLE UNITED
STATES PHARMACOPEIA OR NATIONAL FORMULARY MONOGRAPH, IF A
MONOGRAPH EXISTS, AND THE UNITED STATES PHARMACOPEIA CHAPTER
ON PHARMACY COMPOUNDING;
(B) IF A NATIONAL FORMULARY MONOGRAPH DOES NOT EXIST, ARE
COMPONENTS OF DRUGS APPROVED BY THE FDA; OR
(C) IF A NATIONAL FORMULARY MONOGRAPH DOES NOT EXIST AND
THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES ARE NOT COMPONENTS OF DRUGS APPROVED
BY THE FDA, APPEAR ON THE LIST DEVELOPED BY THE SECRETARY OF THE
FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES PURSUANT TO
21 U.S.C. SEC. 353a (b)(1)(A)(i)(III);
(II) CONFIRMS THAT, IF A BULK DRUG SUBSTANCE IS USED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION, THE BULK
DRUG SUBSTANCE WAS REVIEWED AS PART OF A NEW DRUG APPLICATION
THAT THE FDA HAS APPROVED PURSUANT TO SECTION 505 OF THE
"FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT", 21 U.S.C. SEC. 355;
(III) VERIFIES THAT THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES IN THE
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION ARE HUMAN
PHARMACEUTICAL-GRADE PRODUCTS;
(IV) VERIFIES THAT THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES IN THE
-5- 066

COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION HAVE A VALID CERTIFICATE OF
ANALYSIS, INCLUDING THE IDENTIFICATION AND PURITY OF THOSE BULK
DRUG SUBSTANCES AND THE IDENTIFICATION OF EACH IMPURITY BY
CHEMICAL NAME AND AMOUNT PRESENT;
(V) VERIFIES THAT THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES IN THE
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION WERE MANUFACTURED BY A
MANUFACTURER THAT IS REGISTERED WITH THE FDA IN ACCORDANCE
WITH 21 U.S.C. SEC. 360; AND
(VI) VERIFIES THAT THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES IN THE
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION WERE MANUFACTURED BY A
MANUFACTURER THAT HAS BEEN INSPECTED BY THE FDA AS A HUMAN
DRUG ESTABLISHMENT AND THE INSPECTION CONFIRMED THAT THE
MANUFACTURER WAS:
(A) IN COMPLIANCE WITH CURRENT GOOD MANUFACTURING
PRACTICE REQUIREMENTS THAT COVERED THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES;
AND
(B) CLASSIFIED AS "VOLUNTARY ACTION INDICATED" OR "NO
ACTION INDICATED" BY THE FDA.
(b) BEFORE A COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION
CONTAINING A BULK DRUG SUBSTANCE IS OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE STATE,
THE MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALER OF THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS
MEDICATION SHALL CONDUCT AND DOCUMENT QUALITY CONTROL TESTING
OF THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCE PRIOR TO USING THE BULK DRUG
SUBSTANCE IN THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION, WHICH
TESTING MUST CONFIRM:
(I) THE IDENTITY AND CONTENT OF THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCE;
AND
-6- 066

(II) THAT ANY IMPURITIES PRESENT IN THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCE
ARE IDENTIFIED, CHARACTERIZED, QUANTIFIED, AND JUSTIFIED GIVEN THE
PRODUCT AND ITS INTENDED USE.
(c) A PERSON THAT COMPOUNDS, SELLS, DISTRIBUTES, OR
TRANSFERS A COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION SHALL NOT:
(I) DISTRIBUTE A COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION TO A
PERSON WHEN THE DISTRIBUTOR IS NOT LEGALLY AUTHORIZED TO
DISTRIBUTE OR TRANSFER THE BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES USED IN THE
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION;
(II) DISTRIBUTE, DISPENSE, OR ADMINISTER A COMPOUNDED
WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION THAT IS COUNTERFEIT, ADULTERATED,
MISBRANDED, DIVERTED, OR OTHERWISE IN VIOLATION OF FEDERAL OR
STATE LAW;
(III) FAIL TO MAINTAIN REASONABLE SAFEGUARDS TO PREVENT
CONTAMINATION, DIVERSION, THEFT, OR MISUSE OF THE COMPOUNDED
WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION IN VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE FEDERAL OR
STATE LAW;
(IV) SHIP OR DISTRIBUTE FINISHED COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS
MEDICATION OR ACTIVE PHARMACEUTICAL INGREDIENTS TO A PERSON NOT
LEGALLY AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW TO RECEIVE,
COMPOUND, MANUFACTURE, DISTRIBUTE, OR DISPENSE SUCH DRUGS;
(V) MAKE A MATERIALLY FALSE OR MISLEADING REPRESENTATION
THAT THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION IS APPROVED BY THE
FDA WHEN THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION IS NOT
APPROVED BY THE FDA;
(VI) MAKE A MATERIALLY FALSE, MISLEADING, OR UNVERIFIED
CLAIM REGARDING THE EFFICACY, SAFETY, COMPARATIVE PERFORMANCE,
-7- 066

CLINICAL OUTCOMES, OR OTHER THERAPEUTIC BENEFITS OF THE
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION; OR
(VII) REPRESENT DIRECTLY OR BY IMPLICATION THAT THE
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION HAS SUPERIOR EFFICACY OR
SAFETY COMPARED TO ANOTHER MEDICALLY APPROPRIATE PRODUCT,
UNLESS THAT SUPERIORITY HAS BEEN DEMONSTRATED BY
WELL-CONTROLLED CLINICAL STUDIES AND IS SUPPORTED BY COMPETENT
SCIENTIFIC EVIDENCE.
(3) Labeling requirements.
(a) THE LABEL OF A COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION
MUST:
(I) LIST EACH OF THE ACTIVE INGREDIENTS IN THE MEDICATION
AND THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION ABOUT EACH INGREDIENT:
(A) THE ESTABLISHED NAME OF THE INGREDIENT; AND
(B) THE QUANTITY OR PROPORTION OF THE INGREDIENT; AND
(II) CONTAIN THE FOLLOWING STATEMENTS, PRINTED IN A CLEAR
AND CONSPICUOUS MANNER ON THE LABEL:
(A) "THIS IS A COMPOUNDED DRUG. COMPOUNDED DRUGS ARE NOT
APPROVED BY THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION
AND HAVE NO EVIDENCE OF SAFETY OR EFFICACY."
(B) "THIS ITEM IS NOT FOR RESALE."
(b) A PERSON THAT SELLS, TRANSFERS, OR DISTRIBUTES A
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION TO A PATIENT SHALL PROVIDE
THE PATIENT WITH THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) ANY SIDE EFFECTS, ADVERSE REACTIONS, CONTRAINDICATIONS,
PRECAUTIONS, AND WARNINGS ASSOCIATED WITH THE COMPOUNDED
WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION; AND
-8- 066

(II) IF A COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION CONTAINS AN
ACTIVE INGREDIENT THAT IS LISTED OR IS CLAIMED TO BE THE SAME AS AN
ACTIVE INGREDIENT IN A DRUG THAT IS APPROVED BY THE FDA, A
SUMMARY OF THE RISK INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I)
OF THIS SECTION THAT IS ON THE LABEL OF THE FDA-APPROVED DRUG.
(4) Deceptive advertising.
(a) A PERSON SHALL NOT MAKE A FALSE OR MISLEADING CLAIM,
INCLUDING AN UNSUBSTANTIATED CLAIM, ABOUT A COMPOUNDED
WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION WHEN THE PERSON IS ADVERTISING OR
OTHERWISE PROMOTING THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION.
(b) A CLAIM ABOUT A COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION IS
CONSIDERED MISLEADING IF THE CLAIM DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A DISCLOSURE OF THE POTENTIAL SIDE EFFECTS, ADVERSE
REACTIONS, CONTRAINDICATIONS, PRECAUTIONS, AND WARNINGS
ASSOCIATED WITH ACTIVE INGREDIENTS IN THE COMPOUNDED
WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION;
(II) A SUMMARY OF THE SPECIFIED RISK INFORMATION FOR AN
ACTIVE INGREDIENT OF THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION
THAT IS LISTED OR CLAIMED TO BE THE SAME AS AN ACTIVE INGREDIENT
IN AN FDA-APPROVED DRUG, WHICH RISK INFORMATION IS CONTAINED ON
THE LABEL OF THE FDA-APPROVED DRUG;
(III) A CLEAR, CONSPICUOUS STATEMENT THAT THE PRODUCT IS A
COMPOUNDED MEDICATION, HAS NOT BEEN APPROVED BY THE FDA AND
HAS NOT BEEN EVALUATED BY THE FDA FOR SAFETY OR EFFICACY; AND
(IV) A DISCLOSURE OF THE ENTITIES, SUCH AS SPECIFIC
PHARMACIES AND OUTSOURCING FACILITIES, THAT ARE USED TO
COMPOUND THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION.
-9- 066

(5) Records and inspections.
(a) (I) A PERSON THAT SELLS, TRANSFERS, OR DISTRIBUTES
COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION SHALL MAINTAIN ALL RECORDS
RELATED TO THE ACQUISITION, EXAMINATION, AND TESTING OF THE BULK
DRUG SUBSTANCES USED IN THE COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION
FOR AT LEAST TWO YEARS AFTER THE EXPIRATION DATE OF THE LAST LOT
OF COMPOUNDED WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION CONTAINING BULK DRUG
SUBSTANCES.
(II) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL REQUESTS RECORDS FROM A
PERSON THAT SELLS, TRANSFERS, OR DISTRIBUTES COMPOUNDED
WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION, THE PERSON SHALL PROVIDE SUCH RECORDS
TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL WITHIN ONE BUSINESS DAY AFTER RECEIVING
THE REQUEST OR WITHIN ANOTHER REASONABLE TIME FRAME AS
DETERMINED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL BASED ON THE CIRCUMSTANCES
OF THE REQUEST.
(b) (I) TO DETERMINE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INSPECT THE PREMISES OF A PERSON THAT
ENGAGES IN THE COMPOUNDING OF WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION, INCLUDING
A DOMESTIC SUPPLIER, WHOLESALER, REPACKAGER, OR OTHER PROVIDER
OF BULK DRUG SUBSTANCES USED FOR COMPOUNDING WEIGHT-LOSS
MEDICATIONS.
(II) A PERSON THAT REFUSES TO COMPLY WITH AN INSPECTION
CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION IS IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(6) Enforcement.
(a) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THAT A PERSON HAS
VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY:
-10- 066

(I) ASSESS A FINE IN THE AMOUNT OF UP TO ONE THOUSAND
DOLLARS PER COMPOUND PACKAGE UNIT OR VIAL OF A COMPOUNDED
WEIGHT-LOSS MEDICATION THAT IS SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, DISPENSED,
TRANSFERRED, DISTRIBUTED, ADVERTISED, OR PROMOTED IN VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) PURSUE ANY OTHER REMEDY AVAILABLE UNDER THIS ARTICLE
1.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6-1-103, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
HAS EXCLUSIVE AUTHORITY TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 1.
(c) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 1,
NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROVIDES THE BASIS FOR, OR IS THE SUBJECT OF,
A PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(7) Applicability.
(a) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PERSON THAT COMPOUNDS
MORE THAN TWENTY UNITS OF WEIGHT-LOSS DRUGS PER MONTH OR
COMPOUNDS WEIGHT-LOSS DRUGS IN BATCHES OF MORE THAN TWENTY
UNITS.
(b) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) THE COMPOUNDING OF A DRUG ADMINISTERED BY A
PRACTITIONER AT AN ENTITY LICENSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-1.5-103
(1)(a)(I)(A);
(II) A LONG-TERM CARE FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
12-280-103 (25);
(III) AN ASSISTED LIVING RESIDENCE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
25-27-102 (1.3);
(IV) A HOME CARE AGENCY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-27.5-102
-11- 066

(3);
(V) THE PACE PROGRAM, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-5-412;
(VI) AN ADULT DAY CARE FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
25.5-6-303 (1); OR
(VII) THE COMPOUNDING OF A DRUG FOR ANIMAL USE.
SECTION 3. Applicability. This act applies to conduct occurring
on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-12- 066